Hawaii statutes.
§328-47 Cold stored goods to be labeled;
sales of. It shall be unlawful to sell or to offer for sale uncooked
articles of food, which have been cold stored without notifying persons
purchasing, or intending to purchase, the same that they have been kept in cold
storage by the display, in a conspicuous place and upon the articles of food,
of a sign marked, “These are cold stored goods”, in large, plain type; and it
shall be unlawful to represent or advertise as fresh goods, articles of food
which have been placed in cold storage. [L 1925, c 194, §8; RL 1935, §1069; RL
1945, §2238; RL 1955, §51-46; HRS §328-47]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next